Utah statutes.
72-7-509.   Existing outdoor advertising not in conformity with part -- When removal required -- When relocation allowed.

(1)  Any outdoor advertising lawfully in existence along the interstate or the primary systems on May 9, 1967, and which is not then in conformity with its provisions is not required to be removed until five years after it becomes nonconforming or pursuant to the provisions of Section 72-7-510.

(2)  Any existing outdoor advertising structure that does not comply with Section 72-7-505, but that is located in an industrial and commercial area, an unzoned industrial and commercial area, or an area where outdoor advertising would otherwise be permitted, may be remodeled and relocated on the same property in a commercial or industrial zoned area, or another area where outdoor advertising would otherwise be permitted under this part.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

